Louisiana, session 2026, HB746.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:387(A) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§387. Special permits
A.(1) No vehicle or combination of vehicles that does not meet the
requirements of R.S. 32:380 through 386 shall use the public highways of this state
without first obtaining a special permit from the department in addition to any other
special permit which may be required from any other agency or department of the
state or a political subdivision, and the special permit herein provided for in this
Section shall be issued at the discretion of the secretary. If a permit issued pursuant
to Subsection B of this Section authorizes a vehicle to operate on interstate
highways, the secretary may allow the vehicle to operate on interstate highways at
night if requested by the owner or operator.
(2) The provisions of this Subsection shall not apply to the parishes of
Bossier and Caddo.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 746 ENROLLED
Section 2. A moratorium is hereby established, for a period of one year from the
effective date of this Act, on the enactment or adoption of any ordinance, rule, or regulation
that creates or modifies permit requirements for oversized vehicles. During this moratorium,
political subdivisions may continue to issue permits under existing requirements but shall
not adopt or implement any new or revised permit requirements for oversized vehicles.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.